Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1812YH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 344 Section 1. Section 237A.13, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 2 thereof the following: 3 6. The department shall reimburse a child care provider 4 who provides child care to a child participating in the state 5 child care assistance program at the rate the provider would 6 typically charge a private-pay family for child care. 7